Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.070

Office of board—Records available for public inspection.

The board of directors shall maintain an office where all records, vouchers and other important papers belonging to the board may be preserved. Such records, vouchers, and other important papers at all reasonable times shall be available for public inspection. The regular meetings shall be held within the district boundaries.

[ 1989 c 232 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.100. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 291 s 10; RRS s 4799; prior: 1897 c 118 s 87; 1890 p 389 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.59.100, 28.62.100.]